Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 23 Parental Succession — Persons with Developmental Disabilities

40.1-23-1.
Parental successor for persons with developmental disabilities.

The natural or adoptive parents, or the survivor of them, of a person who has been determined to be a person with developmental disabilities under regulations of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, may appoint at any time a parental successor for the person. The appointment shall be effective upon the death of the surviving parent and shall be for the period of the lifetime of that person with developmental disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

23-43.2-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 386, § 2.

40.1-23-2.
Who may serve.

A parental successor may be an individual, whether related or not to the person who has been determined to be a person with developmental disabilities under the regulations of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; a bank with a trust department, acting through its trust department; a church, acting through the incumbent of a position to be indicated in the instrument designating or the order appointing the parental successor; or an organization concerned with the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities.

A minor may be named or appointed as a parental successor, but he or she may actually serve only after reaching the age of eighteen (18) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-2; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 386, § 2.

40.1-23-3.
Methods of appointment.

A parental successor may be designated by an acknowledged document in a form to be prescribed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; by the last will and testament of the person or persons having the right to make the nomination; or by formal appointment by the probate court in the city or town in which the petitioner or at least one of several petitioners reside.

Court appointment shall be by petition heard ex parte as a probate matter without notice, unless required by the court. Any designation or appointment of a parental successor may also designate or appoint one or more eligible persons or organizations to serve as successors to the first-named parental successor in the event of the unwillingness, inability, incapacity, or resignation of the first parental successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-4.
Furnishing of appointment documents to director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

In the event the appointment is by court order or will, a copy of the court order, or of the will together with a copy of the order admitting the will to probate, certified by the clerk of the appropriate court, shall be furnished by an interested party to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. No appointment of a parental successor shall be binding on the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals until a properly executed copy of an authorized document or a certified copy of the will, together with a certified copy of the order admitting the will to probate, or a certified copy of the court appointment has been served upon the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-5.
Written consent of intended parental successor.

The written consent of the person or organization intended to serve as the parental successor and of each named successor, thereto, if any, shall accompany the petition for court appointment. The consent or consents shall be forwarded to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her representative, with the executed copy of an authorized document, or with the certified copy of the will and of the order admitting the will to probate, if appointment is by document or will, but the consent or consents need not be forwarded in the event of a court appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-5; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-6.
Rights and privileges of parental successor.

The parental successor, during the period he or she is actually serving, shall have the right to exercise an active and continuing interest in and to be informed concerning the health, education, recreation, and general welfare of the person for whom he or she is named parental successor. The parental successor shall be permitted to take the person from the other state-authorized facilities, profit, nonprofit, or private facilities on visits, trips, or vacations, the same as a parent.

The directors, supervisors, superintendents, operators, or foster parents of the facilities shall inform, advise, and consult with the parental successor, when actually serving, regarding the person for whom the parental successor was named, as though he or she were the natural parent of the person, on all matters pertaining to his or her health, education, recreation, general welfare, and including, but not limited to, matters of medical treatment, surgery, placement, and discharge.

A parental successor shall have the rights and privileges conferred by this section although the person for whom he or she is named parental successor is on placement from any facility operated by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or other facility and not physically resident therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 19; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 6.

40.1-23-7.
Informing director as to parental successor’s whereabouts — Decisions concerning person when parental successor cannot be reached.

During the time that a person is acting as a parental successor, he or she shall keep the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her representative, informed of his or her whereabouts so that he or she can be contacted in case of emergency.

Any bank or church or organization appointed to act as a parental successor shall keep the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her representative, informed of the name and address of the individual who should be contacted in case of emergency.

During the period a parental successor is acting, if, after reasonable effort on the part of the director of the facility where the person is living, or under care, the parental successor cannot be reached, the director of the facility shall be free or the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her representative, shall be free to make decisions in all matters for the best interest of the person for whom the parental successor was named.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-8.
Termination of designation or appointment.

Any designation or appointment of a parental successor is subject to revocation at any time, in the first instance by the person who made the decision, and in the case of appointment by will or formal appointment, by the court in which the will was probated or the formal appointment was made. A person or organization named as parental successor may renounce or resign at any time.

No revocation, renunciation, resignation, death, or state of incapacity will be binding on the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals until he or she has been notified in writing hereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-9.
Limits on responsibilities and duties of parental successor.

A parental successor shall have no financial responsibility to the state for the person for whom he or she is named, and he or she shall have no obligatory duties or responsibilities except as specifically set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-23-10.
Construction — Effect on other laws.

It is specifically intended that the provisions of this chapter shall be available for the benefit of all persons with developmental disabilities who are now resident at state facilities, or on placement from such facilities, or who reside within the state.

This chapter shall not repeal, amend, or modify any law relating to intestate succession or relating to guardians of the person or of the estate of an individual. In the event of the appointment of the guardian of the person, the rights of the guardian will supersede and abrogate the rights of the parental successor of the person for whom a guardian of the person has been appointed, for so long as the appointment of the guardian of the person is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 128, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-10; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 386, § 2.

40.1-23-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.2-11; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 386, § 3, effective July 13, 2001.